North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 4. General Partners.

§ 59-401.
Admission of additional general partners.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, after the filing of a limited partnership’s original certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted only with the specific written consent of each partner.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-402.
Events of withdrawal.

Except as approved by the specific written consent of all partners at the time, a person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership upon the happening of any of the following events:

The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in

G.S. 59-602

;

The general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership as provided in

G.S. 59-702

;

The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, the general partner: (i) makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors; (ii) files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy; (iii) is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent; (iv) files a petition or answer seeking for himself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation; (v) files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the general partner in any proceeding of this nature; or (vi) seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of the general partner’s properties;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, 120 days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within 90 days after the appointment without the general partner’s consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed, or within 90 days after the expiration of any such stay, the appointment is not vacated;

In the case of a general partner who is a natural person,

The general partner’s death; or

The entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating the general partner incompetent to manage his or her person or property;

In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust (but not merely the substitution of a new trustee);

In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of a certificate of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the revocation of its charter;

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, or with the consent of all partners, in the case of a general partner that is an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate’s entire interest in the partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a limited liability company, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the limited liability company; or

In the case of a general partner that is not a natural person, trust, separate partnership, corporation, estate, or limited liability company, the termination of the general partner.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-362, ss. 21, 22; 2001-387, ss. 128, 129, 130, 131.

§ 59-403.
General powers and liabilities.

Except as provided in this Article or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

Except as provided in this Article, a general partner of a limited partnership that is not a limited liability limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners, and a general partner of a limited liability limited partnership has the liabilities of, and has the limitation on liability afforded to, a partner in a registered limited liability partnership under the North Carolina Uniform Partnership Act to persons other than the partnership and the other partners with respect to debts and obligations of the limited partnership incurred while it is a limited liability limited partnership. Except as provided in this Article or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership that is not a limited liability limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners, and a general partner of a limited liability limited partnership has the liabilities of, and has the limitation on liability afforded to, a partner in a registered limited liability partnership under the North Carolina Uniform Partnership Act to the partnership and to the other partners.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the power and authority to delegate to one or more other persons the general partner’s rights and powers to manage and control the business and affairs of the limited partnership, including to delegate to agents, officers, and employees of the general partner or the limited partnership, and to delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons. Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, a delegation by a general partner of a limited partnership shall not cause the general partner to cease to be a general partner of the limited partnership and shall not reduce or absolve the general partner of the general partner’s duties or obligations to the limited partnership or its other partners.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 6; 2001-387, ss. 132, 133.

§ 59-404.
Contributions by a general partner.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of his participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-405.
Voting.

The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners the right to vote (on a per capita or any other basis), separately or with all or any class of the limited partners, on any matter.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§§ 59-406 through 59-500.

Reserved for future codification purposes.